Hawaii statutes.
§183-22 Disposition of fines, etc. All
fines, costs, and other charges imposed or collected pursuant to sections
183-19 to 183-21, shall be deposited in the treasury of the State for use by
the department of land and natural resources for forestry purposes and all such
sums as may be so collected and deposited are appropriated for those purposes.
[L 1921, c 222, pt of §2; RL 1925, §586, subs 12; RL 1935, §195; RL 1945,
§1030; RL 1955, §19-13; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §22; am L 1961, c 132, §1; HRS
§183-22]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next